Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1709
Product, defined.

Product shall mean any tangible chattel, including food or living animals, which the purchaser intends to:

(1) Sell or lease to the general public;

(2) Use to perform a service for the general public;

(3) Resell or attempt to resell to the seller of the seller-assisted marketing plan; or

(4) Provide or attempt to provide to the seller of the seller-assisted marketing plan so that such seller might resell the product to the general public.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 9.